Oklahoma, session 2026, SB845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3251 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:

Req. No. 49 Page 1


1. “Institution of higher education” means an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education; and


2. “Diversity, equity, and inclusion office” means an office,


division, or other unit of an institution of higher education


established for the purpose of:


a. influencing hiring or employment practices at the


institution with respect to race, sex, color, or


ethnicity, other than through the use of color-blind


and sex-neutral hiring processes in accordance with


any applicable state and federal antidiscrimination


laws,


b. promoting differential treatment of or providing


special benefits to individuals on the basis of race,


color, or ethnicity,


c. promoting policies or procedures designed or


implemented in reference to race, color, or ethnicity,


other than policies or procedures approved in writing


by the institution’s general counsel and the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education for the sole


purpose of ensuring compliance with any applicable


court order or state or federal law, or


d. conducting trainings, programs, or activities designed


or implemented in reference to race, color, ethnicity,

Req. No. 49 Page 2


gender identity, or sexual orientation, other than


trainings, programs, or activities developed by an


attorney and approved in writing by the institution’s


general counsel and the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education for the sole purpose of ensuring


compliance with any applicable court order or state or


federal law.


B. The governing board of an institution of higher education


shall ensure that each unit of the institution:


1. Does not, except as required by federal law:


a. establish or maintain a diversity, equity, and


inclusion office,


b. hire or assign an employee of the institution or


contract with a third party to perform the duties of a


diversity, equity, and inclusion office,


c. compel, require, induce, or solicit any person to


provide a diversity, equity, and inclusion statement


or give preferential consideration to any person based


on the provision of a diversity, equity, and inclusion


statement,


d. give preference on the basis of race, sex, color,


ethnicity, or national origin to an applicant for


employment, an employee, or a participant in any


function of the institution, or

Req. No. 49 Page 3


e. require as a condition of enrolling at the institution


or performing any institution function any person to


participate in diversity, equity, and inclusion


training, which:


(1) includes a training, program, or activity


designed or implemented in reference to race,


color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual


orientation, and


(2) does not include a training, program, or activity


developed by an attorney and approved in writing


by the institution’s general counsel and the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for


the sole purpose of ensuring compliance with any


applicable court order or state or federal law;


and


2. Adopts policies and procedures for appropriately


disciplining, including by termination, an employee or contractor of


the institution who engages in conduct in violation of paragraph 1


of this subsection.


C. Nothing in this section may be construed to limit or


prohibit an institution of higher education or an employee of an


institution of higher education from, for purposes of applying for a


grant or complying with the terms of accreditation by an accrediting



Req. No. 49 Page 4


agency, submitting to the grantor or accrediting agency a statement


that:


1. Highlights the institution’s work in supporting:


a. first-generation college students,


b. low-income students, or


c. underserved student populations; or


2. Certifies compliance with state and federal


antidiscrimination laws.


D. The provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this


section may not be construed to apply to:


1. Academic course instruction;


2. Scholarly research or a creative work by an institution of


higher education’s students, faculty, or other research personnel or


the dissemination of the research or work;


3. An activity of a student organization registered with or


recognized by an institution of higher education;


4. Guest speakers or performers on short-term engagements;


5. A policy, practice, procedure, program, or activity to


enhance student academic achievement or postgraduate outcomes that


is designed and implemented without regard to race, sex, color, or


ethnicity;


6. Data collection; or


7. Student recruitment or admissions.



Req. No. 49 Page 5


E. An institution of higher education shall not spend funds


allocated to the institution from the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education for a state fiscal year until the governing board


of the institution submits to the Legislature and the State Regents


a report certifying the board of regents’ compliance with the


provisions of this section during the preceding state fiscal year.


The provisions of this subsection shall apply to funds allocated to


an institution of higher education for the state fiscal year


beginning July 1, 2026.


F. During the interim between each regular session of the


Legislature, the governing board of each institution of higher


education, or the board’s designee, shall testify before the


committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives with


responsibility over higher education regarding the board’s


compliance with the provisions of this section.


G. The State Auditor and Inspector shall periodically conduct a


compliance audit of each institution of higher education to


determine whether the institution has spent state funds in violation


of the provisions of this section. The State Auditor and Inspector


shall adopt a schedule by which compliance audits will be conducted.


The schedule shall ensure that each institution of higher education


is audited at least once every four (4) years.


H. If the State Auditor and Inspector determines pursuant to a


compliance audit conducted as required by subsection G of this

Req. No. 49 Page 6


section that an institution of higher education has spent funds in


violation of the provisions of this section, the institution:


1. Shall cure the violation no later than the one-hundred-


eightieth day after the date on which the determination is made; and


2. If the institution fails to cure the violation as required


by paragraph 1 of this subsection, shall be ineligible to receive


increases in funding allocations from the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education for the next fiscal year.


I. A student or employee of an institution of higher education


who is required to participate in training in violation of


subparagraph e of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section may


bring an action against the institution for injunctive or


declaratory relief.


J. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, in


coordination with institutions of higher education, shall conduct a


biennial study to identify the impact of the implementation of this


section on the application rate, acceptance rate, matriculation


rate, retention rate, grade point average, and graduation rate of


students at institutions of higher education, disaggregated by race,


sex, and ethnicity. No later than December 1 of each even-numbered


year, the State Regents shall electronically submit to the President


Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives a report on the results of the study and any


recommendations for legislative or other action.

Req. No. 49 Page 7


K. An institution of higher education may provide to each


employee in good standing at the institution whose position is


eliminated as a result of implementation of the provisions of this


section a letter of recommendation for employment for a position at


the institution or elsewhere.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-49 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:31 AM

























Req. No. 49 Page 8